en: Paint Binders
xx: Paint Binders
cs: Malířská pojiva
da: Bindemidler til maling
de: Farbenbindemittel
es: Ligantes de pintura
fr: Liants pour peintures
it: Leganti
ja: 塗料バインダー
nl: Verfbindmiddelen
no: Bindemidler
pl: Spoiwa do farb
pt: Aglutinantes de tintas
ru: Связующие вещества для краски
sv: Färgbindemedel
tr: Boya Bağlayıcılar

en: Primers
xx: Primers
cs: Základní barvy
da: Grundmaling
de: Grundierungen
es: Pinturas de fondo
fr: Peintures d'apprêt
it: Mestica
ja: 塗装用プライマー
nl: Grondverf
no: Grunning
pl: Farby do gruntowania
pt: Pintura base
ru: Грунты
sv: Grundfärg
tr: Astar Boyalar

en: Stains
xx: Stains
cs: Mořidla
da: Pletter
de: Farbstoffe
es: Tintes
fr: Teintures
it: Mordente
ja: 塗装用ステイン
nl: Beits
no: Beis
pl: Bejce
pt: Pigmentos
ru: Морилки
sv: Färgämnen
tr: Koyulaştırıcılar

en: Varnishes & Finishes
xx: Varnishes & Finishes
cs: Laky a povrchové úpravy
da: Fernis og overfladebehandling
de: Lacke & Beschichtungen
es: Barnices y acabados
fr: Vernis et produits de finition
it: Vernici e finiture
ja: ニス・仕上げ剤
nl: Lak en verf
no: Lakk og polering
pl: Lakiery i inne powłoki malarskie
pt: Vernizes e finalizadores
ru: Отделочные покрытия
sv: Lack och ytbehandlingar
tr: Vernikler ve Cilalar

en: Plumbing Primer
xx: Plumbing Primer
cs: Instalatérské základní nátěry
da: Grunder til rør
de: Primer für Rohrverbindungen
es: Imprimador para fontanería
fr: Apprêts de plomberie
it: Primer per tubi
ja: 配管用プライマー
nl: Primer voor kunststof leidingen
no: Rørgrunning
pl: Grunt do łączenia rur
pt: Primer para PVC
ru: Средства для первичной обработки труб
sv: Rörprimer
tr: Sıhhı Tesisat Astarı

en: Protective Coatings & Sealants
xx: Protective Coatings & Sealants
cs: Ochranné a povrchové nátěry a těsnicí hmoty
da: Beskyttende påførings- og tætningsmidler
de: Schutzbeschichtungen & Dichtmittel
es: Capas protectoras y selladores
fr: Enduits de protection et matériaux d'étanchéité
it: Sigillanti e rivestimenti protettivi
ja: 保護コーティング・シーリング
nl: Beschermende coatings en dichtingsmiddelen
no: Beskyttende belegg og tetningsmasse
pl: Powłoki ochronne i uszczelnienia
pt: Proteções e vedações
ru: Защитные и герметизирующие покрытия
sv: Skyddsbeläggningar och tätningsmedel
tr: Koruyucu Kaplamalar ve Sızdırmazlık Macunları

en: Solder & Flux
xx: Solder & Flux
cs: Pájky a tavidla
da: Loddemetal og loddemiddel
de: Lötmetall & Flussmittel
es: Soldadura y decapante
fr: Fils de soudure et flux d'alliage
it: Lega per saldare e fondente
ja: はんだ・フラックス
nl: Soldeermiddel en flux
no: Loddetinn og flussmidler
pl: Luty i topniki
pt: Material para solda
ru: Припой и флюс
sv: Lod och flussmedel
tr: Lehim ve Krem Lehim

en: Solvents\, Strippers & Thinners
xx: Solvents\, Strippers & Thinners
cs: Rozpouštědla\, odstraňovače nátěrů a ředidla
da: Opløsningsmidler\, lakfjernere og fortyndingsmidler
de: Lösungsmittel\, Abbeizmittel & Verdünner
es: Disolventes\, decapantes y diluyentes
fr: Solvants\, décapants et diluants, Solvants, Produits chimiques solvants
it: Solventi\, sverniciatori e diluenti
ja: 溶剤・はく離剤
nl: Oplos-\, afbijt\, en verdunningsmiddelen
no: Løsemidler\, malingsfjerner og tynnemidler
pl: Rozpuszczalniki\, rozcieńczalniki i środki do usuwania powłok
pt: Solventes\, removedores e tíner
ru: Растворители и разжижители
sv: Lösningsmedel\, borttagningsmedel och thinner
tr: Çözücüler\, Boya Çıkarıcılar ve Seyrelticiler

en: Wall Patching Compounds & Plaster
xx: Wall Patching Compounds & Plaster
cs: Tmely na opravy stěn a sádra
da: Spartelmasse og puds
de: Wandausbesserungsmaterial & Gips
es: Yeso y compuestos para tapar agujeros en la pared
fr: Enduits de rebouchage et plâtre
it: Intonaco e composti per riparare pareti
ja: 壁補修材・プラスター
nl: Muurvullers en gips
no: Blandinger og murpuss til veggreparasjon
pl: Szpachle i gipsy do ścian
pt: Gesso e compostos para conserto de paredes
ru: Составы для ремонта стен и гипс
sv: Spackel och gips
tr: Duvar Yamama Bileşikleri ve Plasterler

en: Building Materials
xx: Building Materials
cs: Stavební materiály
da: Byggematerialer
de: Baumaterialien
es: Materiales de construcción
fr: Matériaux de construction, Matériau de construction réemployable, Matériau du bâtiment réemployable
it: Materiali da costruzione
ja: 建築材料
nl: Afbouwmaterialen
no: Byggematerialer
pl: Materiały budowlane
pt: Materiais de construção
ru: Строительные материалы
sv: Byggnadsmaterial
tr: Yapı Malzemeleri

en: Countertops
xx: Countertops
cs: Kuchyňské desky
da: Køkkenbordplader
de: Arbeitsplatten
es: Encimeras
fr: Comptoirs et plans de travail
it: Piani di lavoro
ja: カウンタートップ
nl: Aanrechtbladen
no: Benkeplater
pl: Blaty
pt: Balcões
ru: Кухонные столешницы
sv: Bänkskivor
tr: Mutfak Tezgahları

en: Door Hardware
xx: Door Hardware
cs: Kování dveří
da: Dørtilbehør
de: Türbeschläge & -klingeln
es: Artículos para puertas
fr: Quincaillerie pour portes
it: Componenti per porte
ja: ドア用品・取付金具
nl: Deurbeslag
no: Utstyr til dører
pl: Wyposażenie do drzwi
pt: Acessórios para portas
ru: Дверная фурнитура
sv: Dörrtillbehör
tr: Kapı Hırdavatları

en: Door Bells & Chimes
xx: Door Bells & Chimes
cs: Domovní zvonky
da: Dørklokker
de: Türklingeln
es: Timbres
fr: Sonnettes et carillons
it: Campanelli per porte
ja: ドアチャイム
nl: Deurbellen
no: Dørklokker
pl: Dzwonki i gongi do drzwi
pt: Campainhas da porta
ru: Дверные звонки
sv: Dörrklockor och ringklockor
tr: Kapı Zil ve Çanları

en: Door Closers
xx: Door Closers
cs: Zavírače dveří
da: Dørlukkere
de: Türschließer
es: Cierrapuertas
fr: Ferme-porte
it: Chiudiporte
ja: ドアクローザー
nl: Deurdrangers
no: Dørlukkere
pl: Automaty do zamykania drzwi
pt: Portas automáticas
ru: Доводчики
sv: Dörrstängare
tr: Kapı Kapatıcılar

en: Door Frames
xx: Door Frames
cs: Dveřní rámy
da: Dørkarme
de: Türrahmen
es: Marcos de puertas
fr: Encadrements de porte
it: Telai per porte
ja: ドア枠
nl: Deurkozijnen
no: Dørkarmer
pl: Ościeżnice
pt: Estruturas de portas
ru: Дверные рамы
sv: Dörrkarmar
tr: Kapı Kasaları

en: Door Keyhole Escutcheons
xx: Door Keyhole Escutcheons
cs: Ozdobné štítky klíčových dírek
da: Nøglehulsbeslag
de: Schlüssellochverzierungen für Türen
es: Escudos para cerraduras de puertas
fr: Entrées de serrure
it: Bocchette per serrature
ja: ドア用鍵穴装飾プレート
nl: Sleutelgatplaatjes voor deuren
no: Nøkkelhullbeslag
pl: Szyldy do zamków
pt: Fechaduras decorativas para portas
ru: Накладки на замочные скважины для дверей
sv: Nyckelbeslag
tr: Kapı Anahtar Deliği Kapakları

en: Door Knobs & Handles
xx: Door Knobs & Handles
cs: Dveřní kliky\, koule a madla
da: Dørgreb og -håndtag
de: Türknäufe & -klinken
es: Picaportes y manijas para puertas
fr: Boutons et poignées de porte
it: Maniglie per porte e maniglie
ja: ドアノブ・ドアレバー
nl: Deurknoppen en -krukken
no: Dørkvridere og -håndtak
pl: Gałki i klamki do drzwi
pt: Maçanetas e puxadores
ru: Дверные ручки
sv: Dörrkläppar
tr: Kapı Topuz ve Kolları

en: Door Knockers
xx: Door Knockers
cs: Klepadla
da: Dørbankere
de: Türklopfer
es: Llamadores
fr: Heurtoirs de porte
it: Batacchi
ja: ドアノッカー
nl: Deurkloppers
no: Dørhammere
pl: Kołatki do drzwi
pt: Aldravas
ru: Дверные молотки
sv: Portklappar
tr: Kapı Tokmakları

en: Door Push Plates
xx: Door Push Plates
cs: Ochranné desky na dveře
da: Trykplader til døråbning
de: Türdruckplatten
es: Manijas para puertas
fr: Plaques de porte
it: Piastre per spinta porte
ja: ドア押板
nl: Duwplaten voor deuren
no: Døråpnerknapper
pl: Powierzchnie dotykowe na drzwi
pt: Protetores para maçanetas e puxadores
ru: Металлические листы для защиты дверей
sv: Dörrplattor
tr: Kapı İtme Levhaları

en: Door Stops
xx: Door Stops
cs: Dveřní zarážky
da: Dørstoppere
de: Türstopper
es: Topes
fr: Butoirs de porte
it: Fermaporta
ja: ドアストッパー
nl: Deurstops
no: Dørstoppere
pl: Odboje drzwiowe
pt: Batentes de portas
ru: Дверные упоры
sv: Dörrstopp
tr: Kapı Tamponları